New Jersey, session 222, S1438.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 1 of P.L.2021, c.250 (C.18A:3B-6.3) is amended to read as follows: 1.  a.  As a condition of [serving] being appointed or reappointed to serve as a member of the governing board of a public institution of higher education, a person shall be required to complete a training program developed by [that institution in consultation with] the Secretary of Higher Education that is designed to clarify the roles and duties of a governing board member. b.    (1)The training shall be completed no later than [one year] six months after the date that the person is appointed as a member of the governing board of a public institution of higher education [except that a] and within six months of the start of each successive term thereafter.  A person who serves as a member of a governing board prior to the effective date of [this act] P.L.2021, c.250 shall not be required to complete the training, except that the member shall be required to complete the training within six months of the start of each successive term thereafter. (2) In addition to the requirement established pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, all members of a governing board of a public institution at which a State monitor has been appointed pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2023, c.115 (C.18A:3B-53.4) shall complete the training no later than six months after the appointment of the State monitor. c.     The [institution, in consultation with the] secretary[,] shall: (1)   prescribe the subject matter of the training which shall include, but need not be limited to, governance responsibilities, ethical standards, due diligence, the requirements of the "Senator Byron M. Baer Open Public Meetings Act," P.L.1975, c.231 (C.10:4-6 et seq.), and P.L.1963, c.73 (C.47:1A-1 et seq.), issues associated with laws on privacy, board member fiduciary responsibilities and the role of the governing board in the financial management of an institution of higher education, and a review of the types of financial, organizational, legal, and regulatory issues that a member of a governing board may be required to consider in the course of discharging the member's governance responsibilities; (2)   [provide the training directly or] arrange for [, or specify,] [the] an entity or entities to provide the training.  In the case of a county college, the secretary shall designate the New Jersey Council of County Colleges to provide the training [;] , in consultation with the secretary; and; (3)   [conduct a periodic review of the prescribed subject matter of the training to insure that the training includes information on relevant changes to State or federal law and other information deemed necessary to enable governing board members to serve effectively;] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.  ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) (4)   [certify completion of the training for each governing board member upon receipt of documentation thereof, as provided on a form and in a manner prescribed by the secretary, or otherwise arrange for certification by the training entity; and] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.    , c.  ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) (5) take other such actions as the secretary determines appropriate to effectuate the purposes of this act. d.  The institution shall certify completion of the training required under this section for each governing board member upon receipt of documentation thereof, as provided on a form and in a manner prescribed by the secretary. e.  The secretary shall provide notification to a governing board member who has failed to comply with the requirements of this section and provide the member with a 30-day grace period to fulfill the outstanding training requirement. The secretary may provide additional extensions to the grace period.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, failure to fulfill the outstanding training requirement within the grace period may, at the discretion of the secretary, constitute a resignation from the governing board.  If the secretary determines that the member has resigned, a vacancy shall be deemed to exist and the board member shall be disqualified from being reappointed to the board, or appointed to any other governing board of a public institution of higher education, for the succeeding two-year period. f.  Training pursuant to this section may, upon approval of the secretary, be made available online. (cf: P.L.2021, c.250, s.1) 2.  Section 17 of P.L.2009, c.308 (C.18A:3B-62) is repealed. 3.  (New section)  There is annually appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of the Secretary of Higher Education the sum of $350,000 to effectuate the purposes of P.L.   , c.    (C.     ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill. 4.  This act shall take effect on the 1st day of the seventh month next following the date of enactment, but the Secretary of Higher Education may take such anticipatory administrative action in advance thereof as shall be necessary for the implementation of the act.